en: Tire tread style: File tread; Inverted; Knobby; Mixed; Semi-slick; Slick; Studded; Other
zh-TW: 輪胎胎紋樣式: 銼刀紋; 反向紋; 顆粒紋; 混合紋; 半光頭胎; 光頭胎; 雪釘; 其他
ro-RO: Stil al profilului de rulare: Profil tip pilă; Inversat; Cu crampoane; Mixt; Semi-slick; Slick; Cu ținte; Altele
hu: Gumiabroncs futófelületének stílusa: Finoman rovátkolt minta; Invertált; Bütykös; Vegyes; Semi-slick; Slick; Szöges; Egyéb
fr: Motif de la bande de roulement: Bande de roulement à pointe de diamant; Inversé; À crampons; Mixte; Semi-slick; Slick; Clouté; Autre
sv: Typ av däckmönster: Filsmönster; Inverterat; Nabbat; Blandat; Semi-slick; Slick; Dubbat; Övrigt
bg-BG: Стил на протектора на гумата: Грайфер тип пила; Обърнат грайфер; Бутонен грайфер; Смесен грайфер; Полуслик; Слик; С шипове; Друго
el: Σχέδιο πέλματος ελαστικού: Πέλμα τύπου λίμας; Ανεστραμμένο; Με τακούνια; Μικτό; Semi-slick; Slick; Με καρφιά; Άλλο
pl: Styl bieżnika opony: Bieżnik o wzorze pilnika (file tread); Bieżnik odwrócony; Opona z klockami (knobby); Bieżnik mieszany; Semi-slick; Slick; Z kolcami; Inny
pt-BR: Padrão do sulco do pneu: Banda de rodagem tipo lixa; Invertido; Com cravos; Misto; Semislick; Slick; Com pinos; Outros
sk-SK: Štýl dezénu pneumatiky: Pilníkový vzor; Obrátený; Štuplový; Zmiešaný; Semi-slick; Slick; S hrotmi; Iné
pt-PT: Padrão do piso do pneu: Banda de rodagem tipo lima; Invertida; Com relevo; Mista; Semilisa; Lisa; Com cravos; Outra
fi: Renkaan kulutuspinnan malli: Viilakuvio; Käännetty; Nappula; Seka; Semi-slick; Slick; Nastoitettu; Muu
ru: Стиль протектора шины: Ромбовидный протектор; Перевёрнутый протектор; Агрессивный протектор; Смешанный; Полуслик; Слик; Шипованный; Другое
tr: Lastik sırt deseni: File desen; Ters desenli; Dişli; Karma; Yarı düz; Slick; Çivili; Diğer
nb: Mønsterstil for dekk: Fil-mønster; Invertert; Grovmønstret; Blandet; Semi-slick; Slick; Pigget; Annet
vi: Kiểu gai lốp: Gai nhám; Lõm; Có núm; Hỗn hợp; Bán trơn; Trơn; Có đinh; Khác
nl: Bandprofiel stijl: Vijlprofiel; Omgekeerd; Noppen; Gemengd; Semi-slick; Slick; Met spikes; Overige
it: Stile del battistrada dello pneumatico: Battistrada zigrinato; Invertito; Tassellato; Misto; Semi-slick; Slick; Chiodato; Altro
hr-HR: Stil gaznog sloja gume: Sitni uzorak (file tread); Obrnuti uzorak; Kramponi; Mješoviti uzorak; Poluglatko (semi-slick); Glatko (slick); Sa šiljcima; Ostalo
ja: タイヤトレッドパターン: ファイルトレッド; インバーテッド; ノビー; ミックス; セミスリック; スリック; スタッド; その他
es: Estilo de banda de rodadura del neumático: Banda de rodadura tipo lima; Invertida; Con tacos; Mixta; Semi-slick; Slick; Con clavos; Otro
de: Reifenprofil: Diamantprofil; Invertiert; Stollenprofil; Gemischt; Semi-Slick; Slick; Spikes; Sonstige
lt-LT: Padangų protektoriaus stilius: Smulkus protektorius; Apverstas; Gumbuotas; Mišrus; Pusiau glotnus; Glotnus; Dygliuotas; Kita
cs: Styl dezénu pneumatiky: Pilníkový vzorek; Obrácený vzorek; Špuntový; Smíšený; Semi-slick; Slick; S hroty; Jiné
th: รูปแบบดอกยาง: ลายตะไบ; ลายกลับด้าน; ลายดอกยางแบบตุ่ม; ลายผสม; กึ่งสลิก; สลิก; แบบฝังหมุด; อื่นๆ
da: Slidbanestil for dæk: Fil-mønster; Inverteret; Knopmønster; Blandet; Semi-slick; Slick; Med pigge; Andet
zh-CN: 轮胎胎面花纹样式: 锉刀纹; 反向花纹; 颗粒胎; 混合花纹; 半光头胎; 光头胎; 镶钉胎; 其他
sl-SI: Stil tekalne plasti pnevmatike: Droben profil; Obrnjen profil; Čepast profil; Mešan profil; Semi-slick; Slick; Z žebljički; Drugo
ko: 타이어 트레드 스타일: 파일 트레드; 인버티드; 노비; 혼합형; 세미 슬릭; 슬릭; 스터디드; 기타